Maine, session 132, LD188.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17 MRSA §3203, as repealed and replaced by PL 2003, c. 452, Pt. I, §54
and affected by Pt. X, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 17 MRSA §3203-A, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 87, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §903, sub-§1, ¶H, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2
and affected by Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
H. Violation of the Maine Unfair Trade Practices Act, or Title 17, section 3203;
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §1108, sub-§1, ¶G, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2
and affected by Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
G. Violation of Title 5, sections 206 to 212; Title 17, section 3203; or Title 30‑A,
sections 3751 to 3760;